Illinois, session 104th, SB1457.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Counties Code is amended by changing 5Section 5-12020 as follows: 6    (55 ILCS 5/5-12020)7    Sec. 5-12020. Commercial wind energy facilities and 8commercial solar energy facilities. 9    (a) As used in this Section:10    "Commercial solar energy facility" means a "commercial 11solar energy system" as defined in Section 10-720 of the 12Property Tax Code. "Commercial solar energy facility" does not 13mean a utility-scale solar energy facility being constructed 14at a site that was eligible to participate in a procurement 15event conducted by the Illinois Power Agency pursuant to 16subsection (c-5) of Section 1-75 of the Illinois Power Agency 17Act. 18    "Commercial wind energy facility" means a wind energy 19conversion facility of equal or greater than 500 kilowatts in 20total nameplate generating capacity. "Commercial wind energy 21facility" includes a wind energy conversion facility seeking 22an extension of a permit to construct granted by a county or 23municipality before January 27, 2023 (the effective date of   SB1457- 2 -LRB104 09494 RTM 19555 b1Public Act 102-1123).2    "Facility owner" means (i) a person with a direct 3ownership interest in a commercial wind energy facility or a 4commercial solar energy facility, or both, regardless of 5whether the person is involved in acquiring the necessary 6rights, permits, and approvals or otherwise planning for the 7construction and operation of the facility, and (ii) at the 8time the facility is being developed, a person who is acting as 9a developer of the facility by acquiring the necessary rights, 10permits, and approvals or by planning for the construction and 11operation of the facility, regardless of whether the person 12will own or operate the facility.13    "Nonparticipating property" means real property that is 14not a participating property.15    "Nonparticipating residence" means a residence that is 16located on nonparticipating property and that is existing and 17occupied on the date that an application for a permit to 18develop the commercial wind energy facility or the commercial 19solar energy facility is filed with the county.20    "Occupied community building" means any one or more of the 21following buildings that is existing and occupied on the date 22that the application for a permit to develop the commercial 23wind energy facility or the commercial solar energy facility 24is filed with the county: a school, place of worship, day care 25facility, public library, or community center.26    "Participating property" means real property that is the   SB1457- 3 -LRB104 09494 RTM 19555 b1subject of a written agreement between a facility owner and 2the owner of the real property that provides the facility 3owner an easement, option, lease, or license to use the real 4property for the purpose of constructing a commercial wind 5energy facility, a commercial solar energy facility, or 6supporting facilities. "Participating property" also includes 7real property that is owned by a facility owner for the purpose 8of constructing a commercial wind energy facility, a 9commercial solar energy facility, or supporting facilities.10    "Participating residence" means a residence that is 11located on participating property and that is existing and 12occupied on the date that an application for a permit to 13develop the commercial wind energy facility or the commercial 14solar energy facility is filed with the county.15    "Protected lands" means real property that is: 16        (1) subject to a permanent conservation right 17    consistent with the Real Property Conservation Rights Act; 18    or 19        (2) registered or designated as a nature preserve, 20    buffer, or land and water reserve under the Illinois 21    Natural Areas Preservation Act. 22    "Supporting facilities" means the transmission lines, 23substations, access roads, meteorological towers, storage 24containers, and equipment associated with the generation and 25storage of electricity by the commercial wind energy facility 26or commercial solar energy facility.  SB1457- 4 -LRB104 09494 RTM 19555 b1    "Wind tower" includes the wind turbine tower, nacelle, and 2blades. 3    (b) Notwithstanding any other provision of law or whether 4the county has formed a zoning commission and adopted formal 5zoning under Section 5-12007, a county may establish standards 6for commercial wind energy facilities, commercial solar energy 7facilities, or both. The standards may include all of the 8requirements specified in this Section but may not include 9requirements for commercial wind energy facilities or 10commercial solar energy facilities that are more restrictive 11than specified in this Section. A county may also regulate the 12siting of commercial wind energy facilities with standards 13that are not more restrictive than the requirements specified 14in this Section in unincorporated areas of the county that are 15outside the zoning jurisdiction of a municipality and that are 16outside the 1.5-mile radius surrounding the zoning 17jurisdiction of a municipality. 18    (b-5) A county may not approve the siting of a commercial 19wind energy facility, a commercial solar energy facility, or 20both in an unincorporated area that is located within a 3-mile 21radius of a municipality, if:22        (1) the municipality has not approved the siting of 23    the facility or facilities at that location;24        (2) the county board or the corporate authorities of 25    the municipality have determined that any portion of the 26    facility or facilities will be located on land with a Soil   SB1457- 5 -LRB104 09494 RTM 19555 b1    Productivity Index that is greater than or equal to 90; or2        (3) the county board or the corporate authorities of 3    the municipality have determined that the owners or 4    operators of the facility or facilities have failed to 5    comply with one or more National Pollutant Discharge 6    Elimination System (NPDES) requirements for the site.7    This subsection applies regardless of whether the 8municipality has adopted zoning ordinances under Division 13 9of Article 11 of the Illinois Municipal Code or is regulating 10wind farms and electric-generating wind devices under Section 1111-13-26 of the Illinois Municipal Code. 12    (c) If a county has elected to establish standards under 13subsection (b), before the county grants siting approval or a 14special use permit for a commercial wind energy facility or a 15commercial solar energy facility, or modification of an 16approved siting or special use permit, the county board of the 17county in which the facility is to be sited or the zoning board 18of appeals for the county shall hold at least one public 19hearing. The public hearing shall be conducted in accordance 20with the Open Meetings Act and shall be held not more than 60 21days after the filing of the application for the facility. The 22county shall allow interested parties to a special use permit 23an opportunity to present evidence and to cross-examine 24witnesses at the hearing, but the county may impose reasonable 25restrictions on the public hearing, including reasonable time 26limitations on the presentation of evidence and the   SB1457- 6 -LRB104 09494 RTM 19555 b1cross-examination of witnesses. The county shall also allow 2public comment at the public hearing in accordance with the 3Open Meetings Act. The county shall make its siting and 4permitting decisions not more than 30 days after the 5conclusion of the public hearing. Notice of the hearing shall 6be published in a newspaper of general circulation in the 7county. A facility owner must enter into an agricultural 8impact mitigation agreement with the Department of Agriculture 9prior to the date of the required public hearing. A commercial 10wind energy facility owner seeking an extension of a permit 11granted by a county prior to July 24, 2015 (the effective date 12of Public Act 99-132) must enter into an agricultural impact 13mitigation agreement with the Department of Agriculture prior 14to a decision by the county to grant the permit extension. 15Counties may allow test wind towers or test solar energy 16systems to be sited without formal approval by the county 17board.18    (d) A county with an existing zoning ordinance in conflict 19with this Section shall amend that zoning ordinance to be in 20compliance with this Section within 120 days after January 27, 212023 (the effective date of Public Act 102-1123).22    (e) A county may require: 23        (1) a wind tower of a commercial wind energy facility 24    to be sited as follows, with setback distances measured 25    from the center of the base of the wind tower:    SB1457- 7 -LRB104 09494 RTM 19555 b1Setback Description           Setback Distance 2Occupied Community            2.1 times the maximum blade tip3Buildings                     height of the wind tower to the4                              nearest point on the outside5                              wall of the structure 6Participating Residences      1.1 times the maximum blade tip7                              height of the wind tower to the8                              nearest point on the outside9                              wall of the structure 10Nonparticipating Residences   2.1 times the maximum blade tip11                              height of the wind tower to the12                              nearest point on the outside13                              wall of the structure 14Boundary Lines of             None15Participating Property  16Boundary Lines of             1.1 times the maximum blade tip17Nonparticipating Property     height of the wind tower to the18                              nearest point on the property19                              line of the nonparticipating20                              property   SB1457- 8 -LRB104 09494 RTM 19555 b1Public Road Rights-of-Way     1.1 times the maximum blade tip2                              height of the wind tower3                              to the center point of the4                              public road right-of-way 5Overhead Communication and    1.1 times the maximum blade tip6Electric Transmission         height of the wind tower to the7and Distribution Facilities   nearest edge of the property8(Not Including Overhead       line, easement, or 9Utility Service Lines to      right-of-way 10Individual Houses or          containing the overhead line11Outbuildings) 12Overhead Utility Service      None13Lines to Individual14Houses or Outbuildings 15Fish and Wildlife Areas       2.1 times the maximum blade16and Illinois Nature           tip height of the wind tower17Preserve Commission           to the nearest point on the18Protected Lands               property line of the fish and19                              wildlife area or protected20                              land21    This Section does not exempt or excuse compliance with 22    electric facility clearances approved or required by the 23    National Electrical Code, the The National Electrical   SB1457- 9 -LRB104 09494 RTM 19555 b1    Safety Code, the Illinois Commerce Commission, and the 2    Federal Energy Regulatory Commission, and their designees 3    or successors; . 4        (2) a wind tower of a commercial wind energy facility 5    to be sited so that industry standard computer modeling 6    indicates that any occupied community building or 7    nonparticipating residence will not experience more than 8    30 hours per year of shadow flicker under planned 9    operating conditions;10        (3) a commercial solar energy facility to be sited as 11    follows, with setback distances measured from the nearest 12    edge of any component of the facility:  13Setback Description           Setback Distance 14Occupied Community            150 feet from the nearest15Buildings and Dwellings on    point on the outside wall 16Nonparticipating Properties   of the structure 17Boundary Lines of             None18Participating Property     19Public Road Rights-of-Way     50 feet from the nearest20                              edge 21Boundary Lines of             50 feet to the nearest  SB1457- 10 -LRB104 09494 RTM 19555 b1Nonparticipating Property     point on the property2Not Zoned Residential         line of the nonparticipating3                              property 4Boundary Lines of             500 feet to the nearest5Nonparticipating Property     point on the property6Zoned Residential             line of the nonparticipating7                              property zoned residential 8        (4) a commercial solar energy facility to be sited so 9    that the facility's perimeter is enclosed by fencing 10    having a height of at least 6 feet and no more than 25 11    feet; and 12        (5) a commercial solar energy facility to be sited so 13    that no component of a solar panel has a height of more 14    than 20 feet above ground when the solar energy facility's 15    arrays are at full tilt. 16    The requirements set forth in this subsection (e) may be 17waived subject to the written consent of the owner of each 18affected nonparticipating property.19    (f) A county may not set a sound limitation for wind towers 20in commercial wind energy facilities or any components in 21commercial solar energy facilities that is more restrictive 22than the sound limitations established by the Illinois 23Pollution Control Board under 35 Ill. Adm. Code Parts 900, 24901, and 910.  SB1457- 11 -LRB104 09494 RTM 19555 b1    (g) A county may not place any restriction on the 2installation or use of a commercial wind energy facility or a 3commercial solar energy facility unless it adopts an ordinance 4that complies with this Section. A county may not establish 5siting standards for supporting facilities that preclude 6development of commercial wind energy facilities or commercial 7solar energy facilities. 8    A request for siting approval or a special use permit for a 9commercial wind energy facility or a commercial solar energy 10facility, or modification of an approved siting or special use 11permit, shall be approved if the request is in compliance with 12the standards and conditions imposed in this Act, the zoning 13ordinance adopted consistent with this Code, and the 14conditions imposed under State and federal statutes and 15regulations. 16    (h) A county may not adopt zoning regulations that 17disallow, permanently or temporarily, commercial wind energy 18facilities or commercial solar energy facilities from being 19developed or operated in any district zoned to allow 20agricultural or industrial uses. 21    (i) A county may not require permit application fees for a 22commercial wind energy facility or commercial solar energy 23facility that are unreasonable. All application fees imposed 24by the county shall be consistent with fees for projects in the 25county with similar capital value and cost. 26    (j) Except as otherwise provided in this Section, a county   SB1457- 12 -LRB104 09494 RTM 19555 b1shall not require standards for construction, decommissioning, 2or deconstruction of a commercial wind energy facility or 3commercial solar energy facility or related financial 4assurances that are more restrictive than those included in 5the Department of Agriculture's standard wind farm 6agricultural impact mitigation agreement, template 81818, or 7standard solar agricultural impact mitigation agreement, 8version 8.19.19, as applicable and in effect on December 31, 92022. The amount of any decommissioning payment shall be in 10accordance with the financial assurance required by those 11agricultural impact mitigation agreements. 12    (j-5) A commercial wind energy facility or a commercial 13solar energy facility shall file a farmland drainage plan with 14the county and impacted drainage districts outlining how 15surface and subsurface drainage of farmland will be restored 16during and following construction or deconstruction of the 17facility. The plan is to be created independently by the 18facility developer and shall include the location of any 19potentially impacted drainage district facilities to the 20extent this information is publicly available from the county 21or the drainage district, plans to repair any subsurface 22drainage affected during construction or deconstruction using 23procedures outlined in the agricultural impact mitigation 24agreement entered into by the commercial wind energy facility 25owner or commercial solar energy facility owner, and 26procedures for the repair and restoration of surface drainage   SB1457- 13 -LRB104 09494 RTM 19555 b1affected during construction or deconstruction. All surface 2and subsurface damage shall be repaired as soon as reasonably 3practicable. 4    (k) A county may not condition approval of a commercial 5wind energy facility or commercial solar energy facility on a 6property value guarantee and may not require a facility owner 7to pay into a neighboring property devaluation escrow account. 8    (l) A county may require certain vegetative screening 9surrounding a commercial wind energy facility or commercial 10solar energy facility but may not require earthen berms or 11similar structures. 12    (m) A county may set blade tip height limitations for wind 13towers in commercial wind energy facilities but may not set a 14blade tip height limitation that is more restrictive than the 15height allowed under a Determination of No Hazard to Air 16Navigation by the Federal Aviation Administration under 14 CFR 17Part 77.18    (n) A county may require that a commercial wind energy 19facility owner or commercial solar energy facility owner 20provide:21        (1) the results and recommendations from consultation 22    with the Illinois Department of Natural Resources that are 23    obtained through the Ecological Compliance Assessment Tool 24    (EcoCAT) or a comparable successor tool; and25        (2) the results of the United States Fish and Wildlife 26    Service's Information for Planning and Consulting   SB1457- 14 -LRB104 09494 RTM 19555 b1    environmental review or a comparable successor tool that 2    is consistent with (i) the "U.S. Fish and Wildlife 3    Service's Land-Based Wind Energy Guidelines" and (ii) any 4    applicable United States Fish and Wildlife Service solar 5    wildlife guidelines that have been subject to public 6    review. 7    (o) A county may require a commercial wind energy facility 8or commercial solar energy facility to adhere to the 9recommendations provided by the Illinois Department of Natural 10Resources in an EcoCAT natural resource review report under 17 11Ill. Adm. Code Part 1075. 12    (p) A county may require a facility owner to:13        (1) demonstrate avoidance of protected lands as 14    identified by the Illinois Department of Natural Resources 15    and the Illinois Nature Preserve Commission; or16        (2) consider the recommendations of the Illinois 17    Department of Natural Resources for setbacks from 18    protected lands, including areas identified by the 19    Illinois Nature Preserve Commission.20    (q) A county may require that a facility owner provide 21evidence of consultation with the Illinois State Historic 22Preservation Office to assess potential impacts on 23State-registered historic sites under the Illinois State 24Agency Historic Resources Preservation Act. 25    (r) To maximize community benefits, including, but not 26limited to, reduced stormwater runoff, flooding, and erosion   SB1457- 15 -LRB104 09494 RTM 19555 b1at the ground mounted solar energy system, improved soil 2health, and increased foraging habitat for game birds, 3songbirds, and pollinators, a county may (1) require a 4commercial solar energy facility owner to plant, establish, 5and maintain for the life of the facility vegetative ground 6cover, consistent with the goals of the Pollinator-Friendly 7Solar Site Act and (2) require the submittal of a vegetation 8management plan that is in compliance with the agricultural 9impact mitigation agreement in the application to construct 10and operate a commercial solar energy facility in the county 11if the vegetative ground cover and vegetation management plan 12comply with the requirements of the underlying agreement with 13the landowner or landowners where the facility will be 14constructed. 15    No later than 90 days after January 27, 2023 (the 16effective date of Public Act 102-1123), the Illinois 17Department of Natural Resources shall develop guidelines for 18vegetation management plans that may be required under this 19subsection for commercial solar energy facilities. The 20guidelines must include guidance for short-term and long-term 21property management practices that provide and maintain native 22and non-invasive naturalized perennial vegetation to protect 23the health and well-being of pollinators. 24    (r-5) Each commercial solar energy facility must have the 25minimum number of fire hydrants required by ordinances 26governing the servicing fire department or fire protection   SB1457- 16 -LRB104 09494 RTM 19555 b1district or, if there are no requirements by ordinances 2governing the servicing fire department or fire protection 3district, then the minimum number required by the county 4board. 5    (s) If a facility owner enters into a road use agreement 6with the Illinois Department of Transportation, a road 7district, or other unit of local government relating to a 8commercial wind energy facility or a commercial solar energy 9facility, the road use agreement shall require the facility 10owner to be responsible for (i) the reasonable cost of 11improving roads used by the facility owner to construct the 12commercial wind energy facility or the commercial solar energy 13facility and (ii) the reasonable cost of repairing roads used 14by the facility owner during construction of the commercial 15wind energy facility or the commercial solar energy facility 16so that those roads are in a condition that is safe for the 17driving public after the completion of the facility's 18construction. Roadways improved in preparation for and during 19the construction of the commercial wind energy facility or 20commercial solar energy facility shall be repaired and 21restored to the improved condition at the reasonable cost of 22the developer if the roadways have degraded or were damaged as 23a result of construction-related activities.24    The road use agreement shall not require the facility 25owner to pay costs, fees, or charges for road work that is not 26specifically and uniquely attributable to the construction of   SB1457- 17 -LRB104 09494 RTM 19555 b1the commercial wind energy facility or the commercial solar 2energy facility. Road-related fees, permit fees, or other 3charges imposed by the Illinois Department of Transportation, 4a road district, or other unit of local government under a road 5use agreement with the facility owner shall be reasonably 6related to the cost of administration of the road use 7agreement. 8    (s-5) The facility owner shall also compensate landowners 9for crop losses or other agricultural damages resulting from 10damage to the drainage system caused by the construction of 11the commercial wind energy facility or the commercial solar 12energy facility. The commercial wind energy facility owner or 13commercial solar energy facility owner shall repair or pay for 14the repair of all damage to the subsurface drainage system 15caused by the construction of the commercial wind energy 16facility or the commercial solar energy facility in accordance 17with the agriculture impact mitigation agreement requirements 18for repair of drainage. The commercial wind energy facility 19owner or commercial solar energy facility owner shall repair 20or pay for the repair and restoration of surface drainage 21caused by the construction or deconstruction of the commercial 22wind energy facility or the commercial solar energy facility 23as soon as reasonably practicable. 24    (t) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, a facility 25owner with siting approval from a county to construct a 26commercial wind energy facility or a commercial solar energy   SB1457- 18 -LRB104 09494 RTM 19555 b1facility is authorized to cross or impact a drainage system, 2including, but not limited to, drainage tiles, open drainage 3ditches, culverts, and water gathering vaults, owned or under 4the control of a drainage district under the Illinois Drainage 5Code without obtaining prior agreement or approval from the 6drainage district in accordance with the farmland drainage 7plan required by subsection (j-5). 8    (u) The amendments to this Section adopted in Public Act 9102-1123 do not apply to: (1) an application for siting 10approval or for a special use permit for a commercial wind 11energy facility or commercial solar energy facility if the 12application was submitted to a unit of local government before 13January 27, 2023 (the effective date of Public Act 102-1123); 14(2) a commercial wind energy facility or a commercial solar 15energy facility if the facility owner has submitted an 16agricultural impact mitigation agreement to the Department of 17Agriculture before January 27, 2023 (the effective date of 18Public Act 102-1123); or (3) a commercial wind energy or 19commercial solar energy development on property that is 20located within an enterprise zone certified under the Illinois 21Enterprise Zone Act, that was classified as industrial by the 22appropriate zoning authority on or before January 27, 2023, 23and that is located within 4 miles of the intersection of 24Interstate 88 and Interstate 39. 25(Source: P.A. 102-1123, eff. 1-27-23; 103-81, eff. 6-9-23; 26103-580, eff. 12-8-23; revised 7-29-24.)   SB1457- 19 -LRB104 09494 RTM 19555 b1    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 2becoming law.